Mississippi, session 2026, HB660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-1-12, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 45-1-12.  (1)  The salaries of all officers of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol who have completed the course of instruction in an authorized highway patrol training school on general law enforcement, and are serving as a sworn officer of the Highway Patrol in the enforcement of the laws of the State of Mississippi, including service in any other division of the Department of Public Safety, and the sworn law enforcement officers of the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, shall be determined and paid in accordance with the scale for officers salaries as provided in this subsection: Department of Public Safety Sworn Officers Salary Schedule Rank                    Years of Experience Less than 4     Over 4       Over 8        Over 12 Trooper       54,000 Trooper FC                   57,000 Corporal                                  60,000 Sergeant                                                 62,750 Rank                    Years of Experience Over 16        Over 20       Over 24       Over 29 Staff Sgt.     65,750 Sr. Staff Sgt.               68,750 Sgt. 1st Class                             72,000         75,000 Promotional Rank         Years of Experience Over 5  Over 10  Over 15  Over 20  Over 25   Over 29 Master Sgt. 68,750   71,500   74,500   77,500   80,500    83,250 Lieutenant 78,500   81,500   84,500   87,500   90,500    93,500 Captain              91,500   95,000   98,250  101,500   104,500 Promotional Rank Major                                111,000 Lt. Colonel                           120,500 Colonel 131,750 Department of Public Safety/MS Bureau of Narcotics Sworn Officers Salary Schedule Rank                    Years of Experience Less than 4     Over 4       Over 8        Over 12 LE-Agent I    54,000 LE-Agent II                  57,000 LE-Agent III                               60,000 LE-Agent IV                                              62,750 Rank                    Years of Experience Over 16        Over 20       Over 24       Over 29 LE-Agent V     65,750 LE-Agent VI                  68,750 LE-Officer VII                              72,000 LE-Officer VIII                                           75,000 Promotional Rank         Years of Experience Over 5  Over 10 Over 15  Over 20  Over 25  Over 29 Master Sgt.  68,750   71,500 74,500   77,500   80,500   83,250 Lieutenant 78,500    81,500 84,500    87,500    90,500   93,500 Captain               91,750 95,000    98,250   101,250  104,500 Promotional Rank Major                                111,000 Lt. Colonel                           120,500 Colonel                              131,750 (2)  All sworn officers in the Mississippi Highway Patrol and the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics employed on a full-time basis shall be paid a salary in accordance with the above scale.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any rank of any sworn officer not based upon a merit-based promotion or years of experience shall be at the will and pleasure of the appointing authority as approved by the State Personnel Board.  The rank and years of experience of each sworn officer to be used in establishing the salary shall be determined by the rank and years of experience on July 1 of the current fiscal year. (3)  For purposes of applying the rank designation to the above scale, the following job classifications of the State Personnel Board shall be applicable for the Mississippi Highway Patrol: Rank                              Job Classes (a)  Trooper                 DPS-Highway Patrol Officer I LE-Investigator II (b)  Trooper First Class      DPS-Highway Patrol Officer II LE-Investigator III (c)  Corporal                DPS-Highway Patrol Officer III LE-Investigator IV (d)  Sergeant                DPS-Highway Patrol Officer IV LE-Investigator V (e)  Staff Sergeant           DPS-Highway Patrol Officer V (f)  Senior Staff Sergeant    DPS-Highway Patrol Officer VI Tech Spec (g)  Master Sgt/Sgt. F/C      DPS-Assistant Inspector DPS-Highway Patrol Officer VII DPS-Investigator I DPS-Supv. Driver Serv. (h)  Lieutenant              DPS-Air Operations Officer DPS-Dir. Corr. Intelligence DPS-Dist. Executive Officer DPS-Regional Supv. Driver. Serv. DPS-Branch Director LE-Dir/Training LE-Dist. Investigator (i)  Captain                 DPS-Staff Officer (MHP) (j)  Major                   DPS-Bureau Director II (k)  Lt. Colonel             DPS-Deputy Administrator; DPS-Chief of Staff (l)  Colonel/Chief of Patrol  Dir-Office of MS Hwy Safety Patrol (4)  For purposes of applying the rank designation to the above scale, the following job classifications of the State Personnel Board shall be applicable for the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics: Rank                         Job Classes (a)  Agents                  LE-Agent I LE-Agent II LE-Agent III LE-Agent IV LE-Agent V LE-Agent VI (b)  Lieutenant              BN-District Investigator (LT) (c)  Captain                 BN-District Commander (d)  Major                   BN-Bureau Director II Office Director I (e)  Lt. Colonel             BN-Deputy Administrator (f)  Colonel                 Director, Bureau of Narcotics (5)  In any fiscal year after July 1, 2015, in the event the Legislature provides across-the-board salary increases to state employees whose compensation is paid from the State General Fund and subject to specific appropriation therefor by the Legislature, the State Personnel Board shall revise the salary scale above to provide the same percentage or dollar amount increase as has been appropriated for other state employees. (6)  It shall be the duty of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety to file with the Legislative Budget Office and the State Fiscal Officer such data and information as may be required to enable the said Legislative Budget Office and State Fiscal Officer to budget and distribute the funds necessary to compensate the sworn officers of the Department of Public Safety according to the requirements of the salary scale.  Such data and information so filed may be revised from time to time as necessitated to reflect the current number and experience of sworn officers employed by the department. (7)  The Commissioner of Public Safety, with approval by the State Personnel Board, is authorized to set the salaries equitably of sworn law enforcement officers assigned to the Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division, the Mississippi Bureau of Investigation, and Capitol Police based upon the pay scale contained in this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.